Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
INCORPORATION

7-56-201. Articles of incorporation.

A cooperative may be formed pursuant to this article for the transaction of any lawful business. One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a cooperative by delivering articles for the cooperative to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. An incorporator who is an individual shall be eighteen years of age or older.

The articles shall state:

The domestic entity name of the cooperative, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

The principal office address of the cooperative's principal office;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the cooperative's initial registered agent;

Repealed.

If formed without common voting stock, whether the property rights and interests of each member are equal or unequal and, if unequal, the general rule or rules applicable to all members by which the property rights and interests of each member are determined and fixed; provisions for the admission of new members who are entitled to share in the property of the cooperative with the old members in accordance with such general rules; and whether the cooperative is authorized to issue one or more classes of preferred stock or other equity interests and, if so authorized, a statement as to the number of shares of stock of each class or other equity interests and the nature and extent of the preferences, limitations, relative rights, and privileges granted to each;

If formed with stock, the classes of shares and the number of shares of each class the cooperative is authorized to issue. The stock may be divided into preferred and common stock, voting and nonvoting stock, or into any other class of stock. If so divided, the articles must contain a statement as to the number of shares of stock in each class and the nature and extent of the preferences, limitations, relative rights, and privileges granted to each.

The true name and mailing address of each incorporator.

The articles may state:

A provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director as provided in this article;

A provision permitting proportional voting rights based solely upon the patronage of a member with the cooperative, the amount of equity held by the member in the cooperative, or some combination of these methods, as provided in section 7-56-305 (3);

The number and terms of the board of directors, which number shall be not less than three, together with the names and the street addresses of the initial directors. If the names of the initial directors are not stated in the articles, the initial board of directors shall be designated by the incorporator or incorporators following the delivery of the articles to the secretary of state for filing.

The purpose or purposes for which the cooperative is incorporated which may state any lawful business;

A par value for authorized shares of stock or classes of shares;

Provisions defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the cooperative, its board, and its members;

Provisions limiting membership to producers of agricultural products;

A limitation on the handling of products or services for its own members only, or for members and nonmembers, and whether nonmembers are entitled to share in allocations of net margins or are subject to per unit retains;

Provisions for the removal for cause of any director by the members at any regular or special members' meeting;

A provision eliminating or limiting the indemnification of directors, officers, employees, or agents of the cooperatives as otherwise provided in this article;

Any provision that under this article is required or permitted to be stated in the bylaws;

Any other provision not inconsistent with law.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1410, § 39, effective July 1, 2004.)

When incorporated, no member or shareholder as such shall be liable directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution, or otherwise, under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, or in any other manner, for a debt, obligation, or liability of or chargeable to the cooperative.

A member does not have any vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles that may exist from time to time or at any time, including any provision relating to management, control, capital structure, dividend entitlement, purpose, or duration of the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 484, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(c) amended, p. 611, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2)(a) amended, p. 950, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1816, § 18, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1680, § 16, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), IP(2), (2)(a) to (2)(f), IP(3), (3)(c), and (3)(k) amended, p. 2221, § 71, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1), (2)(b), (2)(d), (2)(g), and (4) amended, p. 1410, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2)(d) repealed, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1129, § 3, effective December 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-109 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-202. Amendment of articles.

A cooperative may amend its articles at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles or to delete a provision not required in the articles. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

(1.5) If a cooperative has not issued memberships or shares of stock, its board of directors or, if no directors have been designated or elected, its incorporators may adopt one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation.

The articles of a cooperative may be amended at any regular or special meeting of the members of the cooperative. The proposed amendment must be first approved by a two-thirds majority of the directors. The notice of the meeting of members shall state or have attached to it the proposed amendment and shall be mailed to each member of record at least ten days prior to the meeting date. The proposed amendment shall be approved by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1), unless a higher percentage of approval is required in the articles.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, the board may adopt, without shareholder action, one or more amendments to the articles to:

Delete the statement of names and addresses of the incorporators or of the initial directors;

Delete the statement of the registered agent name and registered agent address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file in the records of the secretary of state containing the registered agent name and registered agent address of the cooperative's registered agent;

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of any or all of the individuals named in the articles, pursuant to section 7-90-301 (6), as being individuals who caused the articles to be delivered for filing;

Except as otherwise provided in section 9 of article XV of the state constitution, change each issued and unissued share of a class into a greater number of whole shares if the cooperative has only shares of that class outstanding; or

Change the cooperative's domestic entity name by substituting the word "cooperative", "association", "incorporated", "company", or "limited", or any abbreviation thereof for a similar word or abbreviation in the domestic entity name, or by adding, deleting, or changing a geographical designation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1411, § 40, effective July 1, 2004.)

A cooperative amending its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment stating:

The domestic entity name of the cooperative; and

The text of each amendment adopted.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1411, § 40, effective July 1, 2004.)

Any amendment to the articles may not be invalidated because of the manner of its adoption unless an action to do so is commenced within two years after the date of filing.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 486, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3)(d) and (5)(a) amended, p. 950, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3)(b) and IP(5) amended, p. 1816, § 19, effective July 1; (3)(b) and IP(5) amended, p. 1681, § 17, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2), (3)(a), (3)(b), and IP(5) amended and (3)(b.5) added, p. 2222, § 72, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1.5) added and (3)(b), (3)(d), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1411, § 40, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-110 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-203. Restated articles.

The board may restate the articles at any time with or without membership action.

The restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring approval by the members, it shall be adopted as provided in section 7-56-202.

If the board submits a restatement for action by the members, the cooperative shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-56-202, to each member entitled to vote on the restatement at the members' meeting at which the restatement will be voted upon. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the restatement, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles.

A cooperative restating its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of restatement stating:

The domestic entity name of the cooperative; and

The text of the restated articles of incorporation.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1412, § 41, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1817, § 20, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1681, § 18, effective October 1, 2002.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 487, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(4)(a) amended, p. 950, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(4) and (4)(e) amended, p. 1817, § 20, effective July 1; IP(4) and (4)(e) amended, p. 1681, § 18, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4) amended, p. 2222, § 73, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 1412, § 41, effective July 1.

7-56-204. Cooperatives desiring to relinquish provisions of this article.

Any cooperative formed under or that has elected to be subject to this article may relinquish being bound by the provisions of this article by amending its articles in the manner provided in section 7-56-202 (2); except that the amendment shall be approved by a two-thirds majority of all the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1) unless a greater vote is required by the articles or bylaws.

The board shall present to the members for approval, as described in subsection (1) of this section, a plan to relinquish the provisions of this article, including:

A statement as to what type of business entity the cooperative is to become after the plan has been adopted;

A statement as to what will be the effect on equities of the cooperative after the plan has been adopted; and

A statement as to the procedures and mechanisms for changing the cooperative to another type of entity.

Amendments to the articles shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1817, § 21, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1681, § 19, effective October 1.

7-56-205. Entities formed under other law but subject to this article.

Any domestic entity or foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state and engaged in any of the activities enumerated in this article but formed under any other law may be considered for all purposes as subject to this article by amending its constituent operating document as necessary to conform to this article and delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement that the entity has determined to accept the benefits of and to be bound by the provisions of this article and has amended its constituent operating document as necessary to conform to this article by amendments adopted in accordance with applicable law and its constituent operating document.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 488, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1817, § 22, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1681, § 20, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2222, § 74, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1412, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-133 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-206. Cooperative name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 489, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(f) amended, p. 759, § 21, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-56-207. Use of the term "cooperative" - penalty for unlawful use. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 490, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

IP(1) amended, p. 950, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 2223, § 75, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1412, § 43, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, p. 1010, § 18, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 18, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former §§ 7-55-111 and 7-56-124 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-208. Bylaws.

The initial board of each cooperative formed under this article shall, within thirty days after the articles become effective, adopt bylaws for the government and management of its affairs that are not inconsistent with law or the articles of the cooperative. Such bylaws may be amended or modified in such manner as the bylaws may provide. If the bylaws do not provide a manner for their amendment, the bylaws may be amended at any time upon a majority vote of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1) at a regular or special meeting, the notice of which meeting shall have stated that consideration would be given at the meeting to amending the bylaws and stating the proposed amendment or amendments.

The bylaws of the cooperative shall prohibit the transfer of the voting common stock or membership in the cooperative to persons not eligible to be a member of the cooperative and, if the cooperative issues certificates of common stock or of membership, the restrictions must be printed upon every certificate of stock or certificate of membership subject to the restrictions. At the election of the cooperative, the restrictions may also be included in the articles.

If not stated in the articles, the bylaws of the cooperative shall include:

The qualifications for membership, manner of succession, and conditions for suspension, withdrawal, or expulsion;

The amount of any membership fee or capital subscription required by the cooperative to become a member, conditions of membership, and procedures for acquiring and repayment of membership capital;

Any limitations on dividends on stock or interest on equity capital;

The time, place, and manner of conducting or determining membership meetings of the cooperative which shall be at least annually;

The number, terms, and time of the election of directors, or the manner for determining the same;

The number of directors that shall constitute a quorum for a meeting of the board, which must be at least a majority;

The number, terms, and titles of officers, their authority and duties as well as the manner of election or appointment, the filling of vacancies, or removal of officers; and

A requirement that the cooperative's business shall be conducted on a cooperative basis for the mutual benefit of the cooperative's members.

In addition to the provisions set forth in subsection (3) of this section, the bylaws may include:

The time, place, and manner of conducting its meetings;

The mode and manner of removal of directors and the mode and manner of filling vacancies on the board caused by death, resignation, or removal;

The compensation of directors and officers or the manner for determining compensation;

The mode and manner of conducting business;

The mode and manner of conducting elections and provisions for voting by ballots forwarded by mail or otherwise;

The manner of assignment and transfer of interests in the cooperative;

The manner of collection and enforcement for member nonpayment or nonperformance, including forfeiture of property rights and interests;

The method of determination of property rights and interests in the cooperative and the value thereof;

Methods and procedures for acquiring and returning equity capital to members and other patrons of the cooperative;

Procedures pursuant to section 7-56-501 (1)(q) for the handling of unclaimed equity capital and other funds declared payable by the cooperative and unclaimed by the holder; and

Such other things as may be proper to carry out the purpose for which the cooperative was formed or the governance of the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 490, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and IP(3) amended, p. 2223, § 76, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-111 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-209. Agricultural marketing cooperatives.

It is hereby recognized that agriculture is characterized by individual production in contrast to the group or factory system that characterizes other forms of industrial production; that the ordinary form of corporate organization permits industrial groups to combine for the purpose of group production and the ensuing group marketing and that the public has an interest in permitting producers of agricultural products to bring to their industry the high degree of efficiency and merchandising skill evidenced in the manufacturing industries; that the public interest urgently needs to prevent the migration from rural to urban communities in order to enhance production of agricultural products and to preserve the agricultural supply of the nation; that the public interest demands that producers of agricultural products be encouraged to attain a more efficient system of marketing their products and procurement of the necessary equipment and supplies through cooperatives.

Upon written request to the commissioner of agriculture by any three persons, the commissioner or a duly authorized representative of the commissioner may supply a written summary of the most current survey prepared by the department of agriculture, if any exists, of the business conditions affecting the proposed purposes of the cooperative, particularly the commodities to be handled. When such a summary is supplied, the commissioner or a representative of the commissioner may separately set forth an opinion, stating the reasons therefor, regarding the viability of the proposed venture.

In addition, the department of agriculture may, at the discretion of the commissioner or a representative of the commissioner, provide other assistance to persons who seek to organize an agricultural cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 492, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-56-105 and 7-56-106 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-210. Renewable energy cooperatives.

It is the policy of this state to encourage local ownership of renewable energy generation facilities to improve the financial stability of rural communities.

Subject to the provisions of this article, a renewable energy cooperative may be organized for the purpose of promoting electric energy efficiency technologies to its members, generating electricity from renewable resources and technologies, and transmitting and selling the electricity at wholesale.

For purposes of this section, "renewable resources or technologies" means biomass, geothermal energy, solar energy, small hydroelectricity, and wind energy. Hydrogen derived from biomass, geothermal energy, solar energy, small hydroelectricity, and wind energy is also considered to be renewable energy for the purposes of this article. "Renewable resources or technologies" does not include pumped storage facilities; hydroelectricity other than small hydroelectricity; coal, natural gas, oil, propane, or any other fossil fuel; or nuclear energy. "Renewable resources or technologies" also does not include hydrogen derived from pumped storage facilities; hydroelectricity other than small hydroelectricity; coal, natural gas, oil, propane, or any other fossil fuel; or nuclear energy.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1121, § 1, effective May 27.